Utah statutes.
58-79-301.   Licensure required -- Issuance of licenses.

(1)  Beginning January 1, 2010, and except as provided in Sections 58-1-307 and 58-79-304, a license is required to provide the services of a hunting guide or outfitter.

(2)  The division shall issue to an individual who qualifies under the provisions of this chapter a license in the classification of:

(a)  hunting guide; or

(b)  outfitter.



Enacted by Chapter 52, 2009 General Session

